District of Columbia statutes.
21-2401.01

Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Uniform Adult Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction Act”.

History

Nov. 25, 2008, D.C. Law 17-270, § 2(b), 55 DCR 11018

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 101 of the Uniform Adult Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction Act.